Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1819.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-8602, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-8602. Vertiport and electric aviation planning A. Beginning September 1, 2026, the department shall: 1. Through consultation with political subdivisions of this state that own or control a public airport, commercial air carriers, the federal aviation administration and any other relevant stakeholders, develop a statewide plan or update the statewide aviation plan to include public vertiports and electric aircraft charging stations and the infrastructure needs of advanced air mobility. 2. Designate a person who has expertise in advanced air mobility within the department as a resource for local and regional jurisdictions that are developing or implementing advanced air mobility, including an electric powered lift aircraft and electric aircraft. The person shall establish working relationships with political subdivisions of this state that own or control a public airport, commercial air carriers, the federal aviation administration, the United States department of transportation and any other relevant stakeholders. B. A political subdivision of this state, in compliance with applicable federal laws, including those laws that apply to the federal aviation administration's and the United States department of transportation's safety standards and after the approval of the vertiport layout plan by the federal AVIATION administration, may establish the location of public and private vertiports, the location of electric aircraft charging stations and the infrastructure needs of advanced air mobility. c. Each public vertiport and public electric aircraft charging station and any separate project for infrastructure needs of advanced air mobility shall be open for public bid with no preference or weight given to an existing public vertiport owner or operator.END_STATUTE